fr: Conservation recommandée: Congelé; Réfrigéré; Température ambiante; Cave à légumes; Autre
en: Recommended storage: Frozen; Refrigerated; Room temperature; Root cellar; Other
es: Almacenamiento recomendado: Congelado; Refrigerado; Temperatura ambiente; Bodega para verduras; Otro
pt-BR: Recomendado armazenamento: Congelado; Refrigerado; Temperatura ambiente; Porão; Outro
th: การเก็บรักษาที่แนะนำ: แช่แข็ง; แช่เย็น; อุณหภูมิห้อง; ห้องใต้ดิน; อื่นๆ
vi: Lưu trữ được khuyến nghị: Đông lạnh; Giữ lạnh; Nhiệt độ phòng; Hầm chứa; Khác
nl: Aanbevolen opslag: Ingevroren; Gekoeld; Kamertemperatuur; Koelkelder; Overig
bg-BG: Препоръчително съхранение: В замразено състояние; Охладено; На стайна температура; В зимник; Други
sk-SK: Odporúčané skladovanie: Mrazené; Chladené; Izbová teplota; Pivnica; Iné
ja: 推奨保管方法: 冷凍; 冷蔵; 常温; 冷暗所; その他
ko: 권장 보관 방법: 냉동; 냉장; 실온; 지하 저장고; 기타
nb: Anbefalt oppbevaring: Frossen; Kjølevare; Romtemperatur; Jordkjeller; Annet
ru: Рекомендуемые условия хранения: В замороженном виде; В охлажденном виде; При комнатной температуре; В погребе; Другое
sv: Rekommenderad förvaring: Fryst; Kyld; Rumstemperatur; Jordkällare; Övrigt
tr: Önerilen saklama koşulları: Dondurulmuş; Soğutulmuş; Oda sıcaklığı; Kiler; Diğer
cs: Doporučené skladování: Zmrazené; Chlazené; Pokojová teplota; Sklepní uskladnění; Ostatní
el: Συνιστώμενες συνθήκες αποθήκευσης: Στην κατάψυξη; Στο ψυγείο; Θερμοκρασία δωματίου; Υπόγειο κελάρι; Άλλο
hu: Ajánlott tárolás: Fagyasztva; Hűtve; Szobahőmérsékleten; Verem/pince; Egyéb
sl-SI: Priporočeno shranjevanje: Zamrznjeno; Hraniti v hladilniku; Sobna temperatura; Klet; Drugo
de: Empfohlene Lagerung: Tiefgekühlt; Gekühlt; Raumtemperatur; Naturkeller; Sonstige
zh-CN: 推荐储存方式: 冷冻; 冷藏; 室温; 地窖; 其他
zh-TW: 建議儲存方式: 冷凍; 冷藏; 常溫; 地窖; 其他
hr-HR: Preporučano skladištenje: Smrznuto; U hladnjaku; Sobna temperatura; Zemljani podrum; Ostalo
fi: Suositeltu säilytys: Pakastettu; Jäähdytetty; Huoneenlämpö; Maakellari; Muu
lt-LT: Rekomenduojamas laikymas: Šaldiklyje; Šaldytuve; Kambario temperatūroje; Rūsyje; Kita
pl: Zalecane przechowywanie: Zamrożone; W lodówce; Temperatura pokojowa; Piwnica; Inne
da: Anbefalet opbevaring: På frost; På køl; Stuetemperatur; Jordkælder; Andet
ro-RO: Păstrare recomandată: Congelat; Refrigerat; Temperatura camerei; Pivniță; Altele
it: Conservazione consigliata: Congelato; Refrigerato; Temperatura ambiente; Cantina; Altro
pt-PT: Armazenamento recomendado: Congelado; Refrigerado; Temperatura ambiente; Despensa subterrânea; Outro